North Dakota statutes. TITLE 16.1 Elections
CHAPTER 16.1-11 Nominations for Office — Primary Election
16.1-11-39.
Individuals nominated in accordance with provisions of chapter eligible as candidates in general election.

All individuals nominated in accordance with this chapter are eligible as candidates to be voted for at the ensuing general election, except as provided in this section.

Upon receipt of the documents filed by each candidate, the filing officer immediately shall complete a thorough review of the documents and notify the candidate of any necessary corrections that must be made before four p.m. on the sixty-fourth day before the primary election. The filing officer may not place a candidate’s name on the primary election ballot if the filed documents are insufficient and remain uncorrected.

If the filing officer discovers, after four p.m. on the sixty-fourth day before the primary election, an insufficiency in the certificate of endorsement or petition or affidavit of candidacy filed by a candidate, the candidate may not be deemed nominated until the insufficiency is corrected. Upon discovery of the insufficiency, the filing officer immediately shall notify the candidate in writing of the necessary corrections. The candidate shall file the necessary corrections as soon as practicable, but not later than four p.m. on the sixty-fourth day before the general election.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 241, § 8; 2021, ch. 164, § 65, effective August 1, 2021.

16.1-11-40.
Primary election and ballot governed by general election provisions.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the primary election ballot must be arranged, and the primary election must be provided for, conducted, and the expenses thereof paid as in the case of a general election.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 241, § 8.

Collateral References.

Effect of irregularities or defects in primary petitions-State cases, 14 A.L.R.6th 543.